Florida, session 2026, HB979.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
42
43 Section 1. Section 163.2525, Florida Statutes, is created
44 to read:
45 163.2525 Infill Redevelopment Act.—
46 (1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the "Infill
47 Redevelopment Act."
48 (2) LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.—The Legislature finds that this
49 state's urban areas lack sufficient land for the development of
50 additional residential uses, which has led to a shortage of
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb979-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 979 2026
51 supply; that parcels of land within or near urban areas are
52 difficult to develop or redevelop because of environmental
53 issues and local regulations; and that facilitating the
54 expedited permitting of such parcels, particularly in areas in
55 which multiple local governments have jurisdiction, serves
56 important public interests in remediating environmentally
57 challenged land and increasing the supply of housing.
58 (3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
59 (a) "Adjacent to" means located next to another parcel of
60 land or portion thereof, including where the parcels are
61 separated only by a roadway, railroad, or other public or
62 private right-of-way or easement.
63 (b) "Density" has the same meaning as in s. 163.3164.
64 (c) "Designated agricultural land" means a parcel of land
65 within a zoning district that allows for agricultural uses such
66 as farming, raising livestock, or aquaculture as the main
67 permitted uses and which land is classified as agricultural land
68 under s. 193.461.
69 (d) "Environmentally impacted land" means a parcel of land,
70 any portion of which:
71 1. There is a detection of a containment or pollutant
72 above the applicable local, state, or federal residential clean
73 up levels;
74 2. Is, or, prior to or concurrent with development, would
75 be subject to environmental cleanup or site rehabilitation
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb979-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 979 2026
76 requirements pursuant to chapter 376, chapter 403, or local
77 environmental ordinances or regulations, as a result of the
78 presence of environmental containment or pollution present above
79 applicable cleanup target levels; or
80 3. Is located in a brownfield area designated pursuant to
81 s. 376.80.
82 (e) "Local government" means a county, municipality,
83 special district, or political subdivision of the state.
84 (f) "Parcel of land" has the same meaning as in s.
85 163.3164.
86 (g) "Qualifying parcel" means a parcel of land to which
87 this section applies under subsection (4).
88 (h) "Recreational facilities" means one or more parcels of
89 land any portion of which was previously used as a golf course,
90 tennis court, swimming pool, or clubhouse, or another similar
91 use.
92 (i) "Townhouse" means a single-family dwelling unit that
93 is constructed in a series or group of attached units with
94 property lines separating such units.
95 (j) "Urban growth boundary" means a boundary established
96 by a comprehensive plan or land development regulation beyond
97 which the provision of urban services or facilities is limited.
98 The term includes, but is not limited to, urban development
99 boundaries and urban service boundaries.
100 (4) QUALIFYING PARCELS.—
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb979-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 979 2026
101 (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), this section
102 applies to environmentally impacted land consisting of at least
103 5 acres that is adjacent to a zoning district within the same
104 jurisdiction that permits residential uses as of right and is
105 within a county that meets both of the following requirements:
106 1. The county has a population of more than 1.475 million
107 according to the most recent decennial census.
108 2. There are at least 15 municipalities within the county.
109 (b) This section does not apply to any of the following:
110 1. Designated agricultural land.
111 2. Land owned or operated by a local government for public
112 park purposes.
113 3. Land outside an urban growth boundary.
114 4. Land within one-quarter mile of a military installation
115 identified in s. 163.3175(2).
116 5. Land that is owned, or that was owned at any time
117 within the 15 years preceding the effective date of this act, by
118 a public utility as defined in s. 366.02.
119 (5) DEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS.—Notwithstanding any local
120 law, ordinance, or regulation to the contrary, a local
121 government must permit a qualifying parcel to be developed with
122 residential uses. The density of development pursuant to this
123 section shall not exceed the average density of all zoning
124 districts within the same jurisdiction that allow residential
125 uses as of right adjacent to the qualifying parcel, and its
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb979-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 979 2026
126 intensity must comply with the standards of any adjacent zoning
127 district.
128 (6) SUBDIVISION APPROVAL.—A local government must approve
129 an application for the subdivision of a qualifying parcel if the
130 application satisfies the requirements of chapter 177. A local
131 government may not use the subdivision process to restrict
132 development below the density and intensity authorized under
133 subsection (5).
134 (7) BUFFER FROM RESIDENTIAL USES.—If a qualifying parcel
135 is adjacent to single-family homes or townhomes, or both, on all
136 sides, the developer must provide a buffer of at least 20 feet
137 between the new development and the existing single-family homes
138 or townhomes. The buffer area shall be measured from lot line to
139 lot line and must be maintained as open space or improved with
140 passive recreational facilities accessible to the community.
141 Swales and water retention areas shall be considered open space.
142 (8) RECREATIONAL FACILITIES.—
143 (a) If a qualifying parcel includes recreational
144 facilities or areas reserved for recreational use and such
145 recreational facilities or areas are adjacent to single-family
146 homes on all sides, the developer must do all of the following:
147 1. Establish that such facilities or areas, or portions
148 thereof, located on the qualifying parcel have not been in
149 operation or in use for a period of at least 12 consecutive
150 months.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb979-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 979 2026
151 2. Pay double the applicable parks or recreational
152 facilities impact fee that would otherwise apply to the proposed
153 development, to compensate for the loss of open or recreational
154 space.
155 3. Provide written notice delivered by certified mail to
156 all owners of property adjacent to the recreational facilities
157 or areas, which notice includes all of the following
158 information:
159 a. That the developer intends to develop the parcel in
160 accordance with this section.
161 b. That the adjacent property owners may elect to purchase
162 the parcel or portion thereof containing recreational facilities
163 or areas for the purpose of maintaining the parcel, or portions
164 thereof, as recreational areas or open space within 90 days
165 after the date the notice is mailed.
166 c. The price at which the adjacent property owners may
167 purchase the property.
168 (b) Property owners who receive the notice required under
169 subparagraph (a)3. and wish to exercise the option to purchase
170 the parcel or portion thereof containing the recreational
171 facilities or areas must exercise the option and close on the
172 property, including requiring the property to be maintained as a
173 recreational area or open space for at least 30 years through
174 acceptance of a deed restriction or recording of a restrictive
175 covenant, within 90 days after the notice is mailed or forfeit
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb979-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 979 2026
176 the option. The parcel or portion thereof must be offered to
177 such property owners for purchase at a price that may not exceed
178 the greater of:
179 1. An amount equal to the price paid by the property owner
180 plus 10 percent; or
181 2. An amount equal to a bona fide offer to purchase the
182 property received by the property owner within the last 12
183 months plus 10 percent.
184 (9) DEVELOPMENT APPLICATIONS.— The proposed development of
185 a qualifying parcel which complies with the requirements of this
186 section must be administratively approved, and no further action
187 by the governing body of a local government is required. A local
188 government may administratively require a proposed development
189 to comply with local regulations relating to architectural
190 design, such as required color palettes or architectural style,
191 provided such standards would apply to, and are generally
192 applicable to, comparable residential development within the
193 jurisdiction and do not affect the density or intensity of the
194 proposed development. Developers shall be required to establish
195 consistency with applicable concurrency requirements before the
196 issuance of a building permit for any project developed pursuant
197 to this section. Each local government shall maintain on its
198 website a policy containing procedures and expectations for
199 administrative approval under this subsection.
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb979-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 979 2026
200 (10) APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION.—This section applies
201 retroactively to any local law, ordinance, or regulation that is
202 contrary to this section or its intent and must be liberally
203 construed to effectuate its intent.
204 (11) PREEMPTION.—A local government may not adopt or
205 enforce a local law, an ordinance, or a regulation that applies
206 or has the effect of applying a more restrictive or burdensome
207 requirement or procedure to the development of a qualifying
208 parcel which is administratively approved pursuant to this
209 section. Any such law, ordinance, or regulation contrary to this
210 section is void.
211 Section 2. The Division of Law Revision is directed to
212 replace the phrase "the effective date of this act" wherever it
213 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law.
214 Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb979-02-c2